Utah statutes.
15-7-7.   Seals.

If a seal is required or permitted in the execution of a certificated registered public obligation, an authorized officer may cause a facsimile of the seal to be placed on such obligation. Use of a facsimile of the seal has the same legal effect as the impression of the seal.

